Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201016-1106
Public hearing; notice.

After adoption of a resolution pursuant to section 16-1104 and preparation of the required merger plan pursuant to section 16-1105, the city council of each city proposing to enter into such plan shall hold a public hearing on the plan and shall give notice of the hearing by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the city once each week for three consecutive weeks prior to the hearing. Final publication shall be within seven calendar days prior to the hearing. The notice shall describe the contents of the plan and specify that a copy of the plan may be obtained at no charge at the city clerk's office.

Laws 2008, LB1056, § 6.